Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Form and Effect of Deeds of Trust; Sales Thereunder; Assignments; Releases.
§ 55.1-323.
Contents of advertisements of sale.

The advertisement of sale under any deed of trust, in addition to such other matters as may be required by such deed of trust or by the trustee, in his discretion, shall set forth a description of the property to be sold. Such description need not be as extensive as that contained in the deed of trust, but it shall identify the property by street address, if any, or, if none, shall give the general location of the property with reference to streets, routes, or known landmarks. Where available, tax map identification may be used but is not required. The advertisement shall also include the time, place, and terms of sale and shall give the name or names of the trustee or trustees. It shall set forth the name, address, and telephone number of a person, either a trustee or the party secured or his agent or attorney who may be able to respond to inquiries concerning the sale.

If the property being sold is a time-share estate, the advertisement of sale required under subsection A of §

55.1-322

shall set forth, in addition to such other matters as the trustee finds appropriate, (i) a description of the specific time-share estate or estates to be sold, and such description shall also include (a) the name of the time-share project and (b) the street address of the time-share project or, if no street address, the general location of the time-share project with reference to streets, routes, or known landmarks; (ii) the date, time, place, and terms of sale; (iii) the name of the trustee; and (iv) the name, address, and telephone number of the representative, agent, or attorney who is authorized to respond to inquiries concerning the sale and shall give additional information concerning the time-share estate or estates to be sold.
B. 1. If the property being sold is a time-share estate, the advertisement of sale required under subsection A of §

55.1-322

shall set forth, in addition to such other matters as the trustee finds appropriate, (i) a description of the specific time-share estate or estates to be sold, and such description shall also include (a) the name of the time-share project and (b) the street address of the time-share project or, if no street address, the general location of the time-share project with reference to streets, routes, or known landmarks; (ii) the date, time, place, and terms of sale; (iii) the name of the trustee; and (iv) the name, address, and telephone number of the representative, agent, or attorney who is authorized to respond to inquiries concerning the sale and shall give additional information concerning the time-share estate or estates to be sold.

In lieu of the requirements of subdivision 1, the advertisement shall set forth (i) the name of the time-share project in which the time-share estate or estates to be sold are contained; (ii) the street address of the time-share project in which the time-share estate or estates to be sold are contained or, if no street address, the general location of the time-share project with reference to streets, routes, or known landmarks; (iii) the date, time, place, and terms of sale; (iv) the name of the trustee; and (v) the name, address, and telephone number of the representative, agent, or attorney who is authorized to respond to inquiries concerning the sale and shall give additional information concerning the time-share estate or estates to be sold, including providing, upon request, in either hard copy or electronic form, a schedule of the time-share estate or estates to be sold. In addition, the advertisement shall contain a website address where a description of the specific time-share estate or estates to be sold is displayed.

History.

1979, c. 12, § 55-59.3; 2015, cc. 23, 401; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-324.
Powers and duties of trustee in event of sale under or satisfaction of deed of trust.

In the event of sale under a deed of trust, the trustee shall have the following powers and duties in addition to all others:

Written one-price bids may be made and shall be received by the trustee from the beneficiary or any other person for entry by announcement of the trustee at the sale. Any person other than the trustee may bid at the foreclosure sale, including a person who has submitted a written one-price bid. Upon request to the trustee, any other bidder in attendance at a foreclosure sale shall be permitted to inspect written bids. Whenever the written bid of the beneficiary is the highest bid submitted at the sale, such document shall be filed by the trustee with his account of sale required under §

64.2-1309

. The written bid submitted pursuant to this subsection may be prepared by the beneficiary, its agent, or its attorney.

The trustee may require of any bidder at any sale a cash deposit of as much as 10 percent of the sale price, unless the deed of trust specifies a higher or lower maximum, which may be done by the words “bidder’s deposit of not more than dollars may be required” or similar words, before his bid is received, which shall be refunded to the bidder unless the property is sold to him, otherwise to be applied to his credit in settlement or, should he fail to complete his purchase promptly, to be applied to pay the costs and expense of sale and the balance, if any, to be retained by the trustee as his compensation in connection with that sale.

Click to view

The trustee shall receive and receipt for the proceeds of sale, account for the same to the commissioner of accounts pursuant to §

64.2-1309

and apply the same, first, to discharge the expenses of executing the trust, including a reasonable commission to the trustee; secondly, to discharge all taxes, levies, and assessments, with costs and interest if they have priority over the lien of the deed of trust, including the due pro rata thereof for the current year; thirdly, to discharge in the order of their priority, if any, the remaining debts and obligations secured by the deed, and any liens of record inferior to the deed of trust under which sale is made, with lawful interest; and, fourthly, the residue of the proceeds shall be paid to the grantor or his assigns, provided, however, that the trustee as to such residue shall not be bound by any inheritance, devise, conveyance, assignment, or lien of or upon the grantor’s equity, without actual notice thereof prior to distribution, and provided further that such order of priorities shall not be changed or varied by the deed of trust. The trustee’s deed shall show the trustee’s mailing address.

Upon discharge, other than by sale by the trustee, of all debts, duties, and obligations imposed by the deed upon the grantor, including any expenses incurred preparatory to sale, then upon the grantor’s request the trustee shall execute and deliver a good and sufficient deed of release at the grantor’s own proper costs and charges.

History.

1979, c. 12, § 55-59.4; 1997, c. 842; 1998, c. 610; 2010, c. 417; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-325.
Meaning of phrases that may be included in deed of trust.

The following provisions may be incorporated in any deed of trust to secure debts or indemnify sureties in the respective short forms indicated, namely:

The words “identified by trustee’s signature” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “All of which said notes (or other obligations) bear the marginal signature of the trustee for the purpose of identification but for no other purpose whatever.”

The words “deferred purchase money,” “purchase money,” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “This deed of trust is a contemporaneous purchase money deed of trust and secures the payment of deferred purchase money due by the grantor upon the property hereby conveyed.” Any deed of trust securing a loan, proceeds of which are used by the borrower to acquire the secured real property, shall be deemed to be a purchase money deed of trust.

The words “exemptions waived” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The grantor hereby waives the benefit of his exemptions as to the debt hereby secured and as to all other obligations that may be imposed upon him by the provisions of this deed of trust.”

The words “subject to call upon default” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “Should default be made in the payment of any part of the debt hereby secured, principal or interest, at the maturity of such part, or in the event of the breach of any of the covenants entered into or imposed upon the grantor, then the entire obligation of this deed of trust and the whole debt hereby secured shall, at the option of the beneficiaries, become forthwith due and payable.”

The words “renewal or extension permitted” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The grantor hereby consents and agrees that the debt hereby secured, or any part thereof, may be renewed or extended beyond maturity as often as may be desired by agreement between the creditor and any subsequent owner of the property, and no such renewal or extension shall in any way affect the grantor’s responsibility, whether as surety or otherwise.”

The words “reinstatement permitted” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The grantor and any other party assuming liability hereunder hereby consent and agree that if the property conveyed hereby or a substantial portion thereof is transferred to any subsequent owner, and the creditor exercises the right to accelerate the debts secured hereby, the creditor may accept any delinquent payments or other cure of default giving rise to such acceleration from the then owner of the property or any other person and reinstate the indebtedness in accordance with the schedule of maturity as of the time of acceleration or upon such new schedule as may be agreed if renewal or extension are otherwise permitted and no such reinstatement shall in any way affect the liability of such prior parties, whether as surety or otherwise.”The words “renewal, extension, or reinstatement permitted” or similar words shall have the meaning ascribed to the individual words or phrases in this subdivision and in subdivision 5.

The words “right of anticipation reserved” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The grantor reserves the right to anticipate the payment of the debt hereby secured, or any part thereof which is represented by a separate note (or other obligation) at any interest period by the payment of principal and interest to the date of such anticipated payment only.”

The words “priority in direct order of maturity” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The notes (or other obligations) hereby secured have priority amongst themselves in the direct order of their maturities, each having priority over all others falling due after its maturity.” And the words “priority in inverse order of maturity” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The notes (or other obligations) hereby secured have priority amongst themselves in the inverse order of their maturities, each having priority over all others falling due before its maturity.”

The words “insurance required dollars” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The grantor covenants that he will keep the improvements on the property insured against fire in some solvent insurance company approved by the trustee for the benefit of the beneficiaries hereunder in the sum of at least dollars, and will deposit with the trustee or beneficiary the policies, with standard loss payable clauses with full contribution in favor of the trustee as his interest may appear; and the grantor further covenants that in the event of his failure to keep the property so insured and the policies so deposited, then the trustee or any beneficiary may, at his option, effect such insurance and pay the premium thereon, and the money so paid, with interest thereon, shall become a part of the debt hereby secured, in the event of sale to be paid next after the expenses of executing this trust, and shall be otherwise recoverable from the grantor as a debt, but there shall be no obligation upon the trustee or beneficiary to effect such insurance.”

Click to view

The words “substitution of trustee permitted” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “Grantor grants unto the beneficiary or beneficiaries or to a majority in amount of the holders of the obligations secured hereunder and to their assigns the right and power, under the provisions of §

55.1-320

, to appoint a substitute trustee or trustees.”

The words “any trustee may act” or similar words shall be construed as if the deed set forth: “The grantors, and all interested in the obligations hereby secured, by accepting the benefits hereof, agree that all authority, power, and discretion hereinabove granted to the trustees may be exercised by any of them, without any other, with the same effect as if exercised jointly by all of them.”

The words “this is a credit line deed of trust” or similar words, if in capital letters or underscored and on the first page of the deed of trust and containing the name and address of the noteholder, shall have the meaning set forth in §

55.1-318

.

History.

Code 1919, § 5167; 1926, p. 593; 1940, p. 881; Code 1950, § 55-60; 1966, c. 93; 1970, c. 39; 1976, c. 155; 1982, c. 230; 2004, c. 253; 2005, c. 935; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-326.
Evidences of indebtedness placed on equal footing.

When bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness are secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, vendor’s lien, or other lien, such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall, in the event the lien is executed or foreclosed, be secured on an equal footing and shall be paid ratably out of the proceeds of any sale of property subjected to the lien and shall have no priority, the one over the other, whether by priority of assignment or otherwise, unless the instrument creating the lien expressly provides otherwise.

History.

1934, p. 516; Michie Code 1942, § 6457a; Code 1950, § 55-60.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-327.
Sales under deeds of trust that contain no maturity date or provision authorizing sale.

When any property, real or personal, is conveyed by deed of trust to a trustee to secure the payment of a debt, money, notes, bonds, stocks, or other evidences of debt and there is no date fixed for the maturity thereof and such deed of trust contains no provision authorizing the trustee to make sale of such property, or any part thereof, and the reinvestment of the proceeds of sale in other property subject to the terms of such deed of trust, the circuit court, or such court having jurisdiction of the subject matter, upon a complaint filed by any one or more of the lien debtors, in which complaint all persons interested in such lien and all holders of the evidences of debt secured by the deed of trust thereon, and all other necessary or proper parties, except the plaintiffs, shall be made defendants, may order a sale of such property, or any part thereof, and may invest the proceeds of sale under order of court subject to the terms of the deed of trust, provided that (i) the complaint sets forth facts that will justify the sale of the property, to be verified by the affidavit of at least one of the plaintiffs, (ii) no order shall be made authorizing such sale unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the court that the interests of the lien debtor or debtors will be promoted and the interests of no person holding the evidences of debt secured by the deed of trust will be violated thereby, and (iii) the plaintiff or the party for whose benefit the action is brought shall bear the cost.

History.

1932, p. 77; Michie Code 1942, § 5167a; Code 1950, § 55-61; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-328.
Validation of conveyances of real property under trust instrument not authorizing sale.

When any real property is conveyed by deed of trust or other trust instrument to a trustee and there is no provision authorizing the trustee to convey the property that is the subject of the deed of trust, or any part of such property, and the trustee conveys such property or any part of such property, such conveyance shall be valid after a period of 30 years from the date of such conveyance, provided that (i) there have been no adverse claims against the property so conveyed in the interim, and (ii) such conveyances to and from such trustee were properly recorded and indexed at the time of the conveyance, in the appropriate clerk’s office in which deeds are recorded in the county or city in which the property lies.

History.

1962, c. 350, § 55-61.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-329.
Permissible form for notice of sale under deed of trust.

Notice of sale under any deed of trust regardless of whether it conforms with §

55.1-320

, in the absence of provision in such deed of trust requiring other or additional matter, may be substantially in the following form:

Trustee’s Sale of (brief description or identification of property) In execution of a deed of trust (name or names of grantor or grantors unless grantor or grantors request in writing that the same be omitted), dated , recorded in the Clerk’s Office of the court of in Deed Book , page , , the undersigned trustee will offer for sale at public auction (a brief description of the property to include street number or, if none, the general location of property and place of sale) on the day of , 20 at (ante meridian)(noon)(post meridian), the property described in such deed. Terms: (Cash)() Trustee(s) FOR INFORMATION CONTACT: (A trustee or the secured party or his agent) Address Telephone number

Click to view

History.

1946, p. 272; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5167a1; Code 1950, § 55-62; 1977, c. 660; 1979, c. 12; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-330.
Construction of deeds requiring notice by advertisement in newspaper.

Whenever any deed of trust to secure debts or indemnify sureties contains a provision requiring the giving of notice of sale thereunder for a specified number of days by advertisement in one or more newspapers and such advertisement is published in a newspaper published daily or in a newspaper published daily except Sunday, it shall be deemed a sufficient compliance with such provision if such notice is published in consecutive issues of such newspaper for the number of days specified, counting both the day of the first publication and the day of the last publication and intervening Sundays, whether or not such newspaper is published on Sunday. Both the first publication and the last publication may be on Sunday. The publication shall in all other respects comply with the provisions of §§

55.1-322

and

55.1-323

.

Whenever such deed of trust requires advertisement once a week for a specified number of weeks, sale may be had on the day after the last advertisement appears or any day thereafter, and all sales made in conformity with this section prior to January 1, 1972, and otherwise valid are hereby validated.

History.

1934, p. 165; Michie Code 1942, § 5167c; Code 1950, § 55-63; 1962, c. 448; 1975, c. 284; 1977, c. 660; 1979, c. 12; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-331.
Disposition of surplus from trustee’s sale after death of grantor.

Whenever the grantor, or his successor in title, in any deed of trust by which any real property is conveyed in trust to secure debts or indemnify sureties dies prior to a trustee’s sale held pursuant to the deed of trust and the deed of trust contains no definite provision for the distribution of any surplus in the event of the death of the grantor or his successors in title prior to the trustee’s sale held pursuant to the deed of trust, or contains a provision that such surplus shall be paid to the grantor or his heirs or assigns or personal representative, then any surplus of the proceeds of the sale remaining in the possession of the trustee, after discharging the expenses of executing the trust, all tax liens upon the property sold, all debts and obligations secured by the deed of trust, and, in order of their priority, if any, the remaining subsequent debts and obligations secured by the deed, and any liens of record inferior to the deed of trust under which the sale is made, with lawful interest, shall be paid by the trustee to the personal representative of the decedent.

Any such funds possessed by the personal representative shall constitute assets for the payment by him of any debts and demands against the decedent’s estate remaining unsatisfied after the personal estate has been exhausted. Any surplus of the funds so paid to the personal representative and remaining in his possession after the satisfaction of all debts and demands against the estate shall be paid over by him, if the decedent died intestate as to the real property embraced in the deed of trust, to the heirs at law of the decedent, or their successors in title, and if the decedent died testate as to the real property embraced in the deed of trust, then such surplus shall be paid to the persons entitled to the real property under the terms of the decedent’s will, or to their successors in title.

History.

1942, p. 94; Michie Code 1942, § 5167d; 1944, p. 389; Code 1950, § 55-64; 1990, c. 831; 2018, cc. 34, 204; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-332.
Title to real estate sold not affected by nonlisting of secured notes for taxation.

The title to real estate sold under a deed of trust shall not be drawn in question upon the ground that the holder of the notes secured by such deed of trust did not list the same for taxation.

History.

1924, p. 469; 1926, p. 978; 1944, p. 630; Tax Code, §§ 69, 69a; Code 1950, § 55-64.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-333.
Validation of certain sales made under deeds of trust.

All sales that have been made prior to January 1, 1972, under deeds of trust to secure debts and indemnify sureties containing a provision requiring the giving of notice of sale thereunder for a specified number of days by advertisement in one or more newspapers and that were made after publishing the advertisement of sale in a newspaper published daily or in a newspaper published daily except Sunday for the number of days specified in the deed of trust, counting both the day of the first publication and the day of the last publication and intervening Sundays, whether or not such paper was published on Sunday and whether or not such sales were held on the day of the last publication, provided that, in cases when the sale was held on the day of the last publication, the publication was in a newspaper the principal daily edition of which was delivered or publicly sold before the time fixed for the sale, and whether or not the first publication or the last publication, or both, appeared on Sunday, shall be held, and the same are hereby declared, to be valid and effective in all respects, if otherwise valid and effective according to the law then in force, provided, however, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed as affecting any final order entered prior to March 24, 1934, by any court of competent jurisdiction or as affecting any action now pending in any court of competent jurisdiction, and provided further, that nothing in this section shall be so construed as to affect intervening vested rights.

History.

1934, p. 257; Michie Code 1942, § 5167b; Code 1950, § 55-65; 1975, c. 284; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-334.
Validation of certain sales made under deeds of trust prior to October 1, 1977.

All sales that were made prior to October 1, 1977, under deeds of trust to secure debts and indemnify sureties when the notice, advertisement, and conduct of the sale were in accordance with the law of the Commonwealth as it existed on June 30, 1977, are declared to be valid and effective in all respects, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed as affecting any final order entered prior to March 23, 1978, by any court of competent jurisdiction, or any action now pending in a court of competent jurisdiction, or as affecting intervening vested rights, and provided further that no action to vacate or set aside any such sale may be brought after March 23, 1978.

History.

1978, c. 173, § 55-65.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Liens, § 18.

§ 55.1-335.
Validation of other sales under deeds of trust.

All sales that were made prior to January 1, 1972, under deeds of trust to secure debts and indemnify sureties when the notice was not published once a week for four successive weeks or a specified number of successive weeks are declared to be valid and effective in all respects, if other reasonable advertisement of such sale was given and such sale was otherwise valid and effective, provided that nothing herein contained shall be construed as affecting any final order entered prior to March 1, 1944, by any court of competent jurisdiction, or any action now pending in a court of competent jurisdiction, or as affecting intervening vested rights, and provided further that no action may be brought after January 1, 1972, to vacate or set aside any such sale.

History.

1944, p. 128; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5167b1; Code 1950, § 55-66; 1975, c. 284; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-336.
Protection of assignees or transferees of debts secured by real estate; form of certificate of transfer.

Whenever a debt or other obligation secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, or vendor’s lien on real estate has been assigned, the assignor or the assignee, at its option, may cause the instrument of assignment to be recorded in the clerk’s office of the circuit court where such deed of trust, mortgage, or vendor’s lien is recorded, provided that such instrument is otherwise in recordable form, or may cause a certificate of transfer signed by the assignor to be recorded in such clerk’s office, and such instrument of assignment or certificate of transfer, upon recordation, shall operate as a notice of such assignment. The instrument of assignment or certificate of transfer shall be indexed in the name of the assignor and in the names of the obligor or maker, and the trustees, as applicable, all of whose names shall be set forth in such instrument or certificate. The certificate of transfer shall conform substantially to the following:

CERTIFICATE OF TRANSFER Place of Record: Clerk’s Office of the Circuit Court of the of , Virginia Date of [Deed of Trust/Mortgage/Vendor’s Lien]: , Deed Book , Page Name of Obligor or Maker: Names(s) of Trustee(s) [if a Deed of Trust]: Name of Original Payee or Obligee: Original Amount Secured [if applicable]: $ The undersigned, the original payee or obligee [or the subsequent assignee] of the obligation secured by the above-mentioned [Deed of Trust/Mortgage/Vendor’s Lien], hereby certifies that the obligations secured thereby have been assigned to [If a credit line deed of trust, the name and address to which notice may be mailed or delivered to the Noteholder as provided by is as follows: §

55.1-318

] Given under (my/our) hand(s) as of the day of , . (Assignor) of County/City of , to wit: Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before me by this day of , 20. My Commission Expires: Notary Public Notary Registration Number:

Click to view

For purposes of this section, the word “assigned” includes endorsed, pledged, hypothecated, or otherwise transferred. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to invalidate any other form or notice of assignment that may have been recorded prior to July 1, 1994. Nothing in this section shall imply that recordation of the instrument of assignment or a certificate of transfer is necessary in order to transfer to an assignee the benefit of the security provided by the deed of trust, mortgage, or vendor’s lien.

History.

1994, c. 806, § 55-66.01; 1995, c. 807; 1997, c. 205; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts,§ 4.

§ 55.1-337.
Required notice of foreclosure or repossession of manufactured home.

Whenever any assignee of an installment note secured by a security interest on a manufactured home determines that legal action is desirable to enforce the debt resulting in a potential foreclosure or repossession, he shall give prior notice by mail of any action to foreclose or repossess the collateral to any assignor who is liable under a recourse endorsement or by virtue of a reserve account at least 10 business days prior to the enforcement of the security interest or eviction. Assignment by way of pledge of the security interest granted by the assignor shall not be an assignment within the meaning of this section. The failure to so notify the assignor shall not affect any rights of the assignee as against the principal debtor or any party other than the assignor with recourse or a person with rights in a reserve account. Provisions of this section may not be waived by such assignor at the time of the original sale of the installment paper but only after the expiration of at least 30 days from such initial transfer. The assignee shall send such notice to the last known address of the assignor as it appears in the records of the assignee.

History.

1978, c. 462, § 55-66.1:1; 1999, c. 77; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-338.
Release to person dead inures to successors.

A release of a deed of trust or a conveyance of the property embraced in such deed of trust may in all cases be made to the original grantor, whether living or dead, and any release or reconveyance so made shall inure both in law and in equity to the successors in title of such grantor.

History.

Code 1919, § 6456; 1926, p. 82; 1930, p. 71; 1932, p. 121; 1944, p. 199; Code 1950, § 55-66.2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.